Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OPEN ACCESS CONNECTIONS.new text end new text begin $85,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $85,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of housing finance for a grant to Open Access Connections to provide free voice mail services for homeless and low-income people throughout Minnesota so that they have a reliable and consistent communication tool to aid in their search for affordable housing and to help those individuals find and keep jobs that will allow them to maintain their housing. In addition to programs already available in greater Minnesota, $15,000 each year must be used to increase use of and access to community voice mail in the areas outside the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end